Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0709.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1b. A memorial designation may be made under this act
only for an eligible subject that is at least 1 of the following:
(a) A service member, a uniformed officer, or a first
responder who died in the line of duty.
(b) A military unit, military operation, military event, or
military award, the mission or purpose of which is directly related
to 1 or more service members, uniformed officers, or first
responders who died in the line of duty.
(c) An individual, group of individuals, organization, or
JJR S04871'25 (S-2) y8xnrt


event that is historically or culturally significant to this state
or the United States.
(d) A mass casualty event.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 708 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
JJR S04871'25 (S-2) y8xnrt